Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.36.040

Constitutional questions—Notice of ballot title and summary.

Upon the filing of a ballot title under RCW 29A.36.020, the secretary of state shall provide notice of the exact language of the ballot title and summary to the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, and the prime sponsor of measure.

[ 2013 c 11 s 92; 2003 c 111 s 904. Prior: 2000 c 197 s 9; 1993 c 256 s 11; 1965 c 9 s 29.27.065; prior: 1953 c 242 s 3. Formerly RCW 29.27.065.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2000 c 197: See note following RCW 29A.72.050.

Severability—Effective date—1993 c 256: See notes following RCW 29A.84.280.